Illinois, session 104th, SB3105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 50 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/50 new)7    Sec. 50. Conversion therapy funds prohibited. 8Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 9State shall not expend or invest any public funds in any 10organization, nonprofit organization, religious organization, 11or any other entity to be used for conversion therapy. The 12State shall not enter into any contract for the provision of 13conversion therapy. Any contract entered into or renewed after 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15Assembly that is used or will be used for conversion therapy 16shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.17    For purposes of this Section, "conversion therapy" means 18any practices or treatments that seek to change an 19individual's sexual orientation or gender identity, including 20efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions or to 21eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or feelings 22toward individuals of the same gender. This does not include 23counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing   SB3105- 2 -LRB104 17619 HLH 31050 b1gender transition or other counseling or mental health 2services relating to sexual orientation or gender identity, 3including sexual orientation neutral interventions to prevent 4or address unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, 5without seeking to change sexual orientation or gender 6identity.